Connecticut, session 2026, SB00175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
forty million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by The
University of Connecticut for the design and construction of student
housing at the Avery Point Campus.